Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

260.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates a stop order in violation of KRS 260.550(2) or (3) shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the second offense, and have his or her license revoked or suspended or, if the person has no license, be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent offense.

Any person who violates a withdraw from sale order in violation of KRS 260.550(4) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who violates KRS 260.600(4), involving an untimely payment of an assessment fee, shall be charged a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the original amount and shall be required to pay this penalty in addition to the original assessment fee. The original assessment fee and penalties shall be compounded by ten percent (10%) monthly until paid in full. Any assessment fee and penalties remaining unpaid for three (3) successive months shall result in a license revocation.

Any person who fails to comply with KRS 260.610(6) shall be in violation of the egg marketing law and may be subject to license suspension or revocation. In the event of a suspension or revocation, a stop order shall be issued prohibiting the sale of the product. In the event that the original producer or plant is not required to be licensed because of having no direct distribution in the state and the product is distributed through other distribution channels, the producer or plant shall have its product placed under stop order and returned to the distributor. Further distribution in the state shall be prohibited until the department receives an emergency recall plan from the original producer or plant.

Any person who violates any of the shell egg labeling requirements set forth in KRS

260.630

more than four (4) times within a calendar year shall be fined two hundred fifty dollars ($250) starting at the fifth offense, and an additional two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in addition to the previous fine for each subsequent offense.

History.

42c-3e, 1905a-27: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 129, § 11; 1956, ch. 121, § 12; 1956, ch. 128, § 15; 1962, ch. 210, § 42; 1998, ch. 208, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 40, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 35, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 215, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 66, § 7, effective July 15, 2008.

260.991.
Penalties for milk marketing violations. [Repealed.]

260.992.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

260.785

,

260.790

,

260.800

,

260.805

, or

260.809

shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent violation.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

260.777

,

260.780

,

260.783

,

260.793

,

260.795

,

260.797

,

260.807

,

260.820

, or 260.821(2)(c) shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for each subsequent violation.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

260.815

shall be assessed a penalty fee of a minimum of fifteen dollars ($15) or ten percent (10%) of the amount due, whichever is greater, when payment is made.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS 260.821(3) shall be assessed a penalty fee of a minimum of twenty-five dollars ($25) or ten percent (10%) of the amount due, whichever is greater, when payment is made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 120, § 16; 1966, ch. 255, § 224; 1980, ch. 217, § 16, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 229, § 24, effective January 1, 2001.

260.993.
Penalty for violation of regulation adopted by Southern Dairy Compact Commission. [Effective upon contingency.]

Any handler who violates a regulation adopted by the Southern Dairy Compact Commission established in Article III of the Southern Dairy Compact set out in KRS

260.670

shall be subject to a penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Enact Acts 1998, ch. 471, § 3, effective upon contingency.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). This statute was created as a subsection of KRS

260.990

in 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 471, sec. 3. It has been renumbered as KRS

260.993

by the Reviser of Statutes, acting under KRS 7.136(1). In accordance with 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 471, sec. 4, KRS

260.993

will take effect “at such time as three states of the group of states given in Section 20 of the Southern Dairy Compact set out in [KRS

260.670

] enact that compact into law, substantially in the form given in [1998 Ky. Acts ch. 471], and when the consent of the Congress has been obtained to that compact.”